Utah statutes.
4-2-3.   Administration by commissioner.

Administration of the department is under the direction, control, and management of a commissioner appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.  The commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.  The governor shall establish the commissioner's compensation within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.



Amended by Chapter 176, 2002 General Session

